Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; OAKLAND CEMETERY ASSOCIATION OF LITTLE FALLS.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for an annual grant to the Oakland Cemetery Association of Little Falls for maintenance of the Oakland Cemetery located in the city of Little Falls. new text end